Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3408
Rules and regulations.

The auditor may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 8.